California statutes. Financial Code
(1) Before disbursement of loan proceeds, the licensee shall either (A) offer a credit education program or seminar to the borrower that has been previously reviewed and approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section; or (B) invite the borrower to a credit education program or seminar offered by an independent third party that has been previously reviewed and
 approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section. The borrower shall not be required to participate in either of these education programs or seminars. A credit education program or seminar offered pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided at no cost to the borrower.

(2) The licensee shall report each borrower’s payment performance to at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis, upon acceptance as a data furnisher by that consumer reporting agency. For purposes of this section, a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis is one that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)). Any licensee that is accepted as a data furnisher
 after admittance into the program must report all borrower payment performance since its inception of lending under the program, as soon as practicable after its acceptance into the program, but in no event more than six months after its acceptance into the program.

(A) The commissioner may approve a licensee for the program, before that licensee has been accepted as a data furnisher by a consumer reporting agency, if the commissioner has a reasonable expectation, based on information supplied by the licensee, of both of the following:

(i) The licensee will be accepted as a data furnisher, once it achieves a lending volume required of data furnishers of its type by a consumer reporting agency.

(ii) That lending
 volume will be achieved within the first six months of the licensee commencing lending.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the commissioner shall withdraw approval for pilot program participation from any licensee that fails to become accepted as a data furnisher by a consumer reporting agency within six months of commencing lending under the pilot program.

(3) The licensee shall provide each borrower with the name of the consumer reporting agency or agencies to which it will report the borrower’s payment history. A licensee that is accepted as a data furnisher after admittance into the program shall notify its borrowers, as soon as practicable following acceptance as a data furnisher, regarding the name of the consumer reporting agency or agencies to which it will report
 that borrower’s payment history.

(4) (A) The licensee shall underwrite each loan to determine a borrower’s ability and willingness to repay the loan pursuant to the loan terms, and shall not make a loan if it determines, through its underwriting, that the borrower’s total monthly debt service payments, at the time of origination, including the loan for which the borrower is being considered, and across all outstanding forms of credit that can be independently verified by the licensee, exceed 50 percent of   the borrower’s gross monthly income for a loan of no more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or exceed 36 percent of the borrower’s gross monthly income for a loan in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(B) (i) The licensee shall seek information and documentation pertaining to all of a borrower’s outstanding debt obligations during the loan application and underwriting process, including loans that are self-reported by the borrower but not available through independent verification. The licensee shall verify that information using a credit report from at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis or through other available electronic debt verification services that provide reliable evidence of a borrower’s outstanding debt obligations.

(ii) Notwithstanding the verification requirement in subparagraph (A), the licensee shall request from the borrower and include all information obtained from the borrower regarding outstanding deferred deposit transactions in the
 calculation of the borrower’s outstanding debt obligations.

(iii) The licensee shall not be required to consider, for purposes of debt-to-income ratio evaluation, loans from friends or family.

(C) The licensee shall also verify the borrower’s income that the licensee relies on to determine the borrower’s debt-to-income ratio using information from either of the following:

(i) Electronic means or services that provide reliable evidence of the borrower’s actual income.

(ii) Internal Revenue Service Form W-2, tax returns, payroll receipts, bank statements, or other third-party documents that provide reasonably reliable evidence of the borrower’s actual income.

(5) The licensee shall notify each borrower, at least two days before each payment due date, informing the borrower of the amount due, and the payment due date. Notification may be provided by any means mutually acceptable to the borrower and the licensee. A borrower shall have the right to opt out of this notification at any time, upon electronic or written request to the licensee. The licensee shall notify each borrower of this right before disbursing loan proceeds.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 22311 to 22315, inclusive, no person, in connection with, or incidental to, the making of any loan made pursuant to this article, may offer, sell, or require the borrower to contract for “credit insurance” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section
 22314 or insurance on tangible personal or real property of the type specified in Section 22313.

(2) Notwithstanding Sections 22311 to 22315, inclusive, no licensee, finder, or any other person that participates in the origination of a loan under this article shall refer a borrower to any other person for the purchase of “credit insurance” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22314 or insurance on tangible personal or real property of the type specified in Section 22313.

(k) (1) A licensee shall not require, as a condition of providing the loan, that the borrower waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure provided for in any law applicable to the loan, including the right to file and pursue a civil action or file a complaint
 with or otherwise communicate with the commissioner or any court or other public entity, or that the borrower agree to resolve disputes in a jurisdiction outside of California or to the application of laws other than those of California, as provided by law. Any waiver by a borrower must be knowing, voluntary, and in writing, and expressly not made a condition of doing business with the licensee. Any waiver that is required as a condition of doing business with the licensee shall be presumed involuntary, unconscionable, against public policy, and unenforceable. The licensee has the burden of proving that a waiver of any rights, penalties, forums, or procedures was knowing, voluntary, and not made a condition of the contract with the borrower.

(2) A licensee shall not refuse to do business with or discriminate against a borrower or applicant on
 the basis that the borrower or applicant refuses to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including the right to file and pursue a civil action or complaint with, or otherwise notify, the commissioner or any court or other public entity. The exercise of a person’s right to refuse to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including a rejection of a contract requiring a waiver, shall not affect any otherwise legal terms of a contract or an agreement.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to any agreement to waive any right, penalty, remedy, forum, or procedure, including any agreement to arbitrate a claim or dispute, after a claim or dispute has arisen. This subdivision does not affect the enforceability or validity of any other provision of the contract.

(l) This
 section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251. For purposes of this subdivision, “bona fide principal amount” shall be determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1016, Sec. 2.   (AB 237)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22371.

(a) A licensee who is approved by the commissioner to participate in the program may use the services of one or more finders as provided in this article. In addition to the fees and costs authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 22375 and subdivision (a) of Section 22377, the commissioner may charge a licensee who uses the services of one or more finders a fee, following the examination of the finder or finders, in an amount not to exceed that necessary to offset the commissioner’s costs to oversee the activities of that licensee’s finder or finders.

(b) For purposes of this article, a “finder” means an entity that, at the finder’s physical location for business, brings a licensee and a
 prospective borrower together for the purpose of negotiating a loan contract.

(c) An entity, whose sole means of bringing a licensee and a prospective borrower together at that entity’s physical location for business is via an electronic access point through which a prospective borrower may directly access the Internet Web site of a licensee is not a “finder” for purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1016, Sec. 3.   (AB 237)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22372.

(a) A finder may perform one or more of the following services for a licensee at the finder’s physical location for business:

(1) Distributing, circulating, using, or publishing preprinted brochures, flyers, factsheets, or other written materials relating to loans that the licensee may make or negotiate and that have been reviewed and approved in writing by the licensee prior to their being distributed, circulated, or published.

(2) Providing written factual information about loan terms, conditions, or qualification requirements to a prospective borrower that has been either prepared by the licensee or reviewed and approved in writing by the licensee. A finder
 may discuss that information with a prospective borrower in general terms, but may not provide counseling or advice to a prospective borrower.

(3) Notifying a prospective borrower of the information needed in order to complete a loan application without providing counseling or advice to a prospective borrower.

(4) Entering information provided by the prospective borrower on a preprinted or electronic application form or onto a preformatted computer database without providing counseling or advice to a prospective borrower.

(5) Assembling credit applications and other materials obtained in the course of a credit application transaction for submission to the licensee.

(6) Contacting the licensee to determine the status of a loan application.

(7) Communicating a response that is returned by the licensee’s automated underwriting system to a borrower or a prospective borrower.

(8) Obtaining a borrower’s signature on documents prepared by the licensee and delivering final copies of the documents to the borrower.

(b) A finder that is licensed or regulated pursuant to this division, Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000), Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000), Division 3 (commencing with Section 12000), Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000), Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000), Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000), Division 8 (commencing with Section 21000), Division 10 (commencing with Section 23000), or Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of this code; Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the
 Insurance Code; Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code; is an approved agent of a person licensed pursuant to Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000) of this code; or is a federally regulated bank, thrift, or credit union, may additionally provide any of the following services on behalf of the licensee for any loan for which the finder performed finding activities:

(1) Disbursing loan proceeds to a borrower, if this method of disbursement is acceptable to the borrower.

(A) Any loan disbursement made by a finder under this subdivision shall be deemed made by the licensee on the date the funds are disbursed or otherwise made available by the finder to the borrower.

(B) A finder that disburses loan proceeds to a borrower shall deliver or cause to be delivered to
 the borrower at the time loan proceeds are disbursed a plain and complete receipt showing all of the following:

(i) The date of disbursement.

(ii) The total amount disbursed.

(iii) The corresponding loan account identification.

(iv) The following statement, prominently displayed in a type size equal to or greater than the type size used to display the other items on the receipt: “If you have any questions about your loan, now or in the future, you should direct those questions to [name of licensee] by [insert at least two different ways in which a borrower may contact the licensee].” 

(2) Receiving loan payment or payments from the borrower, if this method of payment is acceptable to the
 borrower.

(A) Any loan payment made by a borrower to a finder under this subdivision shall be applied to the borrower’s loan and deemed received by the licensee as of the date the payment is received by the finder.

(B) A finder that receives loan payments under this subdivision shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower at the time that the payment is made by the borrower, a plain and complete receipt showing all of the following:

(i) The name of the finder.

(ii) The total payment amount received.

(iii) The date of payment.

(iv) The corresponding loan account identification upon which the payment is being
 applied.

(v) The loan balance prior to and following application of the payment.

(vi) The amount of the payment that was applied to principal, interest, and fees.

(vii) The type of payment, such as cash, automated clearing house (ACH) transfer, check, money order, or debit card.

(viii) The following statement, prominently displayed in a type size equal to or greater than the type size used to display the other items on the receipt: “If you have any questions about your loan, now or in the future, you should direct those questions to [name of licensee] by [insert at least two different ways in which a borrower may contact the licensee].” 

(C) A borrower who submits a loan payment to a
 finder under this subdivision shall not be liable for any failure or delay by the finder in transmitting the payment to the licensee.

(D) A finder that disburses or receives loan payments pursuant to this subdivision shall maintain records of all disbursements made and loan payments received for a period of at least two years or until one month following the completion of an examination of the licensee by the commissioner, whichever is later. The commissioner shall determine when an examination is complete.

(3) Providing any notice or disclosure required to be provided to the borrower by the licensee, other than the notice required to be provided by the licensee to the borrower pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 22373. A licensee that uses a finder to provide notices or disclosures to borrowers shall maintain a record of which notices and disclosures each finder provides to
 borrowers on its behalf, for the purpose of facilitating the commissioner’s examination of the licensee.

(c) A finder shall not engage in either of the following activities:

(1) Providing counseling or advice to a borrower or prospective borrower.

(2) Providing loan-related marketing material that has not previously been approved by the licensee to a borrower or a prospective borrower.

(d) Any person who performs one or more of the following activities is a broker within the meaning of Section 22004 rather than a finder within the meaning of this section:

(1) Negotiating the price, length, or any other loan term between a licensee and a prospective borrower.

(2) Advising either a prospective borrower or a licensee as to any loan term.

(3) Offering information pertaining to a single prospective borrower to more than one licensee, except that, if a licensee has declined to offer a loan to a prospective borrower and has so notified that prospective borrower in writing, the person may then offer information pertaining to a single prospective borrower to another licensee with which it has a finder’s agreement.

(4) Personally contacting or providing services to a borrower or prospective borrower at any place other than the finder’s physical location for business.

(e) A finder shall comply with all laws applicable to the licensee that impose requirements upon the licensee for safeguards for information
 security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (SB 235)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22373.

(a) At the time the finder receives or processes an application for a program loan, the finder shall provide the following statement to the applicant, on behalf of the licensee, in no smaller than 10-point type, and shall ask the applicant to acknowledge receipt of the statement in writing:

 

“Your loan application has been referred to us by [Name of Finder]. We may pay a fee to [Name of Finder] for the successful referral of your loan application. IF YOU ARE APPROVED FOR THE LOAN, [NAME OF LICENSEE] WILL BECOME YOUR LENDER, AND YOU WILL BE BUILDING A RELATIONSHIP WITH [NAME OF LICENSEE]. If you have any questions about your loan, now or in the future, you should direct those questions to [name of licensee] by [insert at
 least two different ways in which a borrower may contact the licensee]. If you wish to report a complaint about [Name of Finder] or [Name of Licensee] regarding this loan transaction, you may contact the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation at 866-275-2677, or file your complaint online at www.dfpi.ca.gov.”
(b) If the loan applicant has questions about the loan that the finder is not permitted to answer, the finder shall make a good faith effort to assist the applicant in making direct contact with the lender before the loan is consummated. This good faith effort shall, at a minimum, consist of assisting the applicant in communicating with the licensee as soon as reasonably practicable, which shall at a minimum include a “two-way communication.” For purposes of this section, “two-way communication” includes telephone, electronic mail, or another form of communication that allows the
 applicant to communicate with the licensee.

(c) Using the policies developed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 22370, the licensee shall ensure that a loan is not consummated until the licensee has completed a “two-way communication” with the applicant. Sending a voicemail or electronic message to the applicant, without a prior or subsequent response from the applicant, shall not constitute a “two-way communication.”

(d) If the loan is consummated, the licensee shall provide the borrower a written copy of the disclosure notice within two weeks following the date of the loan consummation. A licensee may include the disclosure within its loan contract, or may provide it as a separate document to the borrower, via any means acceptable to the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 138.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22374.

(a) A finder may be compensated by the licensee pursuant to the written agreement between the licensee and the finder, as described in Section 22376. Compensation may be paid in accordance with a compensation schedule that is mutually agreed to by the licensee and the finder.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the compensation of a finder by a licensee shall be subject to all of the following requirements:

(1) No compensation shall be paid to a finder in connection with a loan application unless that loan is consummated.

(2) No compensation shall be paid to a finder based upon the principal
 amount of the loan. 

(3) The total compensation paid by a licensee to a finder over the life of a loan shall not exceed the sum of the origination fee and interest charges paid by the borrower in connection with that loan.

(4) Subject to the limitations set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, the total compensation paid by a licensee to a finder for the services set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 22372 shall not exceed sixty-five dollars ($65) per loan, whether paid at the time of consummation, over installments, or in a manner otherwise agreed upon by the licensee and the finder, plus two dollars ($2) per payment received by the finder on behalf of the licensee for the duration of the loan, when the finder receives borrower loan payments on the licensee’s behalf in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 22372.

(5) The finder’s location for services under this article and other information required by Section 22375 has been reported to the commissioner and the finder has not been barred from providing services at that location by the commissioner.

(c) No licensee shall, directly or indirectly, pass on to a borrower any fee or other compensation, or any portion of any fee or other compensation, that the licensee pays to a finder in connection with that borrower’s loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 505, Sec. 4.   (SB 235)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22375.

A licensee that utilizes the service of a finder shall do all of the following:

(a) Notify the commissioner within 15 days of entering into a contract with a finder, on a form acceptable to the commissioner, regarding all of the following:

(1) The name, business address, and licensing details of the finder and all locations at which the finder will perform services under this article.

(2) The name and contact information for an employee of the finder who is knowledgeable about, and has the authority to execute, the contract governing the business relationship between the
 finder and the licensee.

(3) The name and contact information for one or more employees of the finder who are responsible for that finder’s finding activities on behalf of the licensee.

(4) A list of the activities the finder shall perform on behalf of the licensee.

(5) Any other information requested by the commissioner.

(b) Pay an annual finder registration fee to the commissioner in an amount to be established by the commissioner by regulation for each finder utilized by the licensee.

(c) Submit an annual report to the commissioner including, for each finder, the information listed in
 paragraph (12) and subparagraph (A) of paragraph (13) of subdivision (d) of Section 22380, and any other information pertaining to each finder and the licensee’s relationship and business arrangements with each finder as the commissioner may by regulation require. The information disclosed to the commissioner for the report described in this subdivision is exempted from any requirement of public disclosure by subdivision (b) of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 112.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22376.

All arrangements between a licensee and a finder shall be set forth in a written agreement between the parties. The agreement shall contain a provision establishing that the finder agrees to comply with all regulations that are established by the commissioner pursuant to this article regarding the activities of finders and that the commissioner shall have access to all of the finder’s books and records that pertain to the finder’s operations under the agreement with the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22377.

(a) The commissioner may examine the operations of each licensee and each finder to ensure that the activities of the licensee and the finder are in compliance with this article. The costs of the commissioner’s examination of each finder shall be attributed to the commissioner’s examination of the licensee. Any violation of this article by a finder or a finder’s employee shall be attributed to the finance lender with whom it has entered into an agreement for purposes of determining the licensee’s compliance with this division.

(b) Upon a determination that a finder has acted in violation of this article, or any implementing regulation, or upon a determination that it would be warranted by the data reported to the
 commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 22375 for any finder, the commissioner may disqualify a finder from performing services under this article, bar a finder from performing services at one or more specific locations of that finder, terminate a written agreement between a finder and a licensee, and, if the commissioner deems that action in the public interest, prohibit the use of that finder by all licensees accepted to participate in the pilot program.

(c) In addition to any other penalty allowed by law, the commissioner may impose an administrative penalty up to two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for violations of this article committed by a finder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 505, Sec. 6.   (SB 235)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22378.

Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 22102 and its implementing regulations, a licensee accepted to participate in the program may appoint one or more branch managers with responsibility for multiple branch locations, subject to approval by the commissioner, and a finding by the commissioner that the centralized nature of underwriting and other key business activities performed by the licensee does not require a unique manager for each branch location, to ensure the protection of consumers who seek out loans from the licensee. The commissioner may revoke this approval at any time, upon a finding that a unique branch manager at each branch location is required for consumer protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 318)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22379.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner shall examine each licensee that is accepted into the program, and each finder whose services were used by the licensee, at least once every 24 months.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commissioner shall have the authority to waive one or more branch office examinations, if the commissioner deems that the branch office examinations are not necessary for the protection of the public, due to the centralized operations of the licensee or other factors acceptable to the commissioner.

(c) The cost of each examination of a licensee shall be paid to the
 commissioner by the licensee examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of the cost in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of the examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1016, Sec. 4.   (AB 237)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22380.

(a) On or before July 1, 2015, and annually on or before July 1, 2017, to July 1, 2026, inclusive, the commissioner shall post a report on the commissioner’s internet website summarizing utilization of the Pilot Program for Increased Access to Responsible Small Dollar Loans. The report required to be submitted on or before July 1, 2015, shall additionally include the information required by former Section 22361, summarizing utilization of the Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities, which was created by Chapter 640 of the Statutes of 2010.

(b) The information disclosed to the commissioner for the commissioner’s use in preparing the reports described in this section
 is exempted from any requirement of public disclosure by subdivision (b) of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(c) If there is more than one licensee approved to participate in the program under this article, the reports required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall state information in aggregate so as not to identify data by specific licensee. The information stated in these reports pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (6) of subdivision (d) shall also be set forth for each specific finder whose services were used by a licensee in connection with the loans or loan applications, along with the specific finder’s identity.

(d) Each report required pursuant to this section shall specify the time period to which the report corresponds and shall include, but not be limited to, the following for
 that time period:

(1) The number of entities that applied to participate in the program.

(2) The number of entities accepted to participate in the program.

(3) The reason or reasons for rejecting applications for participation, if applicable. This information shall be provided in a manner that does not identify the entity or entities rejected.

(4) The number of program loan applications received by lenders participating in the program, the number of loans made pursuant to the program, the total amount loaned, the distribution of loan lengths upon origination, and the distribution of interest rates and principal amounts upon origination among those loans.

(5) The number of borrowers who obtained more than one program loan and the distribution of the number of loans per borrower.

(6) Of the number of borrowers who obtained more than one program loan, the percentage of those borrowers whose credit scores increased between successive loans, based on information from at least one major credit bureau, and the average size of the increase.

(7) The income distribution of borrowers upon loan origination, including the number of borrowers who obtained at least one program loan and who resided in a low-to-moderate-income census tract at the time of their loan application.

(8) The number of borrowers who obtained
 loans for the following purposes, based on borrower responses at the time of their loan applications indicating the primary purpose for which the loan was obtained:

(A) Medical.

(B) Other emergency.

(C) Vehicle repair.

(D) Vehicle purchase.

(E) To pay bills.

(F) To consolidate debt.

(G) To build or repair credit history.

(H) To finance a purchase of goods or services other than a vehicle.

(I) For other than personal, family, or household purposes.

(J) Other.

(9) The number of borrowers who self-report that they had a bank account at the time of their loan application, the number of borrowers who self-report that they had a bank account and used check-cashing services, and the number of borrowers who self-report that they did not have a bank account at the time of their loan application.

(10) With respect to refinance loans, each report shall specifically include the following information:

(A) The number and percentage of borrowers who applied for a refinance loan.

(B) Of those borrowers who applied for a refinance loan, the number and percentage of borrowers who obtained a refinance loan.

(C) Of those borrowers who obtained a refinance loan:

(i) The percentage of borrowers who refinanced once.

(ii) The percentage of borrowers who refinanced twice.

(iii) The percentage of borrowers who refinanced more than twice.

(D) Of those borrowers who obtained a refinance loan, the average percentage of principal paid down before obtaining a refinance loan.

(E) Of those borrowers who obtained a refinance loan, the average amount of additional principal extended.

(F) Of those borrowers who obtained a refinance loan, the average number of late payments made on the loan that was refinanced.

(11) The number and type of finders used by licensees and the relative performance of loans consummated by finders compared to the performance of loans consummated without a finder.

(12) The number and percentage of borrowers who obtained one or more program loans on which late fees were assessed, the total amount of late fees assessed, and the average late fee assessed by dollar amount and as a percentage of the principal amount loaned.

(13) (A) The performance of loans under this article, as reflected by all of the following:

(i) The number and percentage of program borrowers who experienced at least one delinquency lasting between 7 and 29 days, and the distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those delinquencies.

(ii) The number and percentage of program borrowers who experienced at least one delinquency lasting between 30 and 59 days, and the distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those delinquencies.

(iii) The number and percentage of program borrowers who experienced at least one delinquency lasting 60 days or more, and the
 distribution of principal loan amounts corresponding to those delinquencies.

(iv) The number and percentage of program borrowers who experienced at least one delinquency of greater than seven days and who did not subsequently bring their loan current.

(v) Among loans that were ever delinquent for seven days or more, the average number of times borrowers experienced a delinquency of seven days or more.

(B) To the extent data are readily available to the commissioner, the commissioner shall include in each report comparable delinquency data for unsecured loans made by persons licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22365) of Division 9 in principal amounts between two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and
 four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($4,999), and in principal amounts between five thousand dollars ($5,000) and nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($9,999), and for unsecured extensions of credit made by state-chartered banks and credit unions under the commissioner’s
 jurisdiction, in principal amounts between two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($4,999), and in principal amounts between five thousand dollars ($5,000) and nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine dollars ($9,999).

(14) The number and types of violations of this article by finders that were documented by the commissioner.

(15) The number and types of violations of this article by licensees that were documented by the commissioner.

(16) The number of times that the commissioner disqualified a finder from performing services, barred a finder from performing services at one or more specific locations of the finder, terminated a written agreement
 between a finder and a licensee, or imposed an administrative penalty.

(17) The number of complaints received by the commissioner about a licensee or a finder and the nature of those complaints.

(18) Recommendations for improving the program.

(19) Recommendations regarding whether the program should continue after January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 113.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22380.5.

(a) The Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities as described in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348) is abolished.

(b) All powers, duties, purposes, jurisdiction, responsibilities, and functions of the Commissioner of Corporations with respect to the former Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348) are transferred to the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(c) Any licensee approved to participate in the Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities as described in the former Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348) shall be transferred to, and subject to, the provisions of this article.

(d) Any outstanding loans made under the former Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities as described in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348) shall continue in existence and be valid on and after January 1, 2014, subject to those terms and conditions that existed at the time the loan was made pursuant to the former Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 22348).

(e) Data submitted to the commissioner by licensees accepted to the former Pilot Program for Affordable Credit-Building Opportunities shall be summarized by the commissioner in the report due to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2015, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 22380.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 139.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 22381.)
-------------------------------------------

22381.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 174, Sec. 2.   (AB 2196)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repeal affects Article 3.6, commencing with Section 22365.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Charges On Scheduled Balances [22400. - 22402.]

22400.

This article applies only to loan contracts payable in substantially equal and consecutive monthly installments of principal and charges combined, the first of which is due not less than 15 days nor more than one month and 15 days from the date the loan is made. In lieu of computing charges and applying payments as provided in Section 22307, a licensee may precompute charges and apply payments as follows:

(a) The total charges which would be earned if the contract were repaid exactly according to